Wisconsin, session 2025, SB491.
do enact as follows:SB491,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB491,27Section 2. 20.255 (2) (ab) of the statutes is created to read:SB491,2,9820.255 (2) (ab) Supplemental hold harmless aid. The amounts in the 9schedule for payments to school districts under s. 121.105 (5).SB491,310Section 3. 20.255 (2) (ab) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 11.... (this act), is repealed.SB491,412Section 4. 20.255 (2) (ac) of the statutes is amended to read:SB491,3,21320.255 (2) (ac) General equalization aids. The amounts in the schedule for the 1payment of educational aids under ss. 121.08, 121.09, 121.095, 121.105 (2) to (4), 2121.137 and subch. VI of ch. 121.SB491,53Section 5. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 4Act 15, is amended to read:SB491,3,105118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. Add the amounts appropriated in the current fiscal year 6under s. 20.255 (2), except s. 20.255 (2) (ab), (ac), (aw), (az), (bb), (dj), (du), (fc), (fm), 7(fp), (fq), (fr), (fu), (k), and (m); and s. 20.505 (4) (es); and the amount, as determined 8by the secretary of administration, of the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (s) 9allocated for payments to telecommunications providers under contracts with 10school districts and cooperative educational service agencies under s. 16.971 (13).SB491,611Section 6. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 12Acts 15 and .... (this act), is amended to read:SB491,3,1813118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. Add the amounts appropriated in the current fiscal year 14under s. 20.255 (2), except s. 20.255 (2) (ab), (ac), (aw), (az), (bb), (dj), (du), (fc), (fm), 15(fp), (fq), (fr), (fu), (k), and (m); and s. 20.505 (4) (es); and the amount, as determined 16by the secretary of administration, of the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (s) 17allocated for payments to telecommunications providers under contracts with 18school districts and cooperative educational service agencies under s. 16.971 (13).SB491,719Section 7. 121.105 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB491,4,220121.105 (5) If the total amount of state aid calculated for a school district 21under s. 121.15 (4) (b) on October 15, 2024, is greater than the total amount of state 22aid calculated for the school district under s. 121.15 (4) (b) on October 15, 2025, the 23department shall, from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (ab), pay the school 24district additional state aid in an amount necessary to ensure the school district 1receives an amount of total state aid in the 2025-26 school year that is equal to the 2amount calculated for the school district on October 15, 2024.SB491,83Section 8. 121.105 (5) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 4(this act), is repealed.SB491,95Section 9. 121.905 (3) (c) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB491,4,86121.905 (3) (c) 6. For the limit for each of the 2015-16 to 2018-19 school years, 7and for the 2021-22 school year, and for any school year thereafter, make no 8adjustment to the result under par. (b).SB491,109Section 10. 121.905 (3) (c) 9. of the statutes is amended to read:SB491,4,1110121.905 (3) (c) 9. For the limit for 2023-2425, add $325 the amount under s. 11121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. to the result under par. (b).SB491,1112Section 11. 121.91 (2m) (j) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB491,1213Section 12. 121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. of the statutes is renumbered 121.91 (2m) (j) 142m. a. and amended to read:SB491,4,1515121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. a. In Subject to subd. 2m. b., in 2023-2425, add $146 $325.SB491,1316Section 13. 121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. b. of the statutes is created to read:SB491,4,1917121.91 (2m) (j) 2m. b. Beginning in the 2025-26 school year, multiply the 18amount under subd. 2m. a. by the sum of 1.0 plus the allowable rate of increase 19under s. 73.0305 expressed as a decimal.SB491,1420Section 14. 121.91 (2m) (j) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB491,4,2321121.91 (2m) (j) 3. Multiply the result under subd. 2. or 2m., whichever is 22applicable, by the average of the number of pupils enrolled in the current school 23year and the 2 preceding school years.SB491,1524Section 15. 121.91 (2m) (r) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB491,5,131121.91 (2m) (r) 1. b. Add an amount equal to the amount of revenue increase 2per pupil allowed under this subsection for the previous school year multiplied by 3the sum of 1.0 plus the allowable rate of increase under s. 73.0305 expressed as a 4decimal to the result under subd. 1. a., except that in calculating the limit for the 52013-14 school year and the 2014-15 school year, add $75 to the result under subd. 61. a., in calculating the limit for the 2019-20 school year, add $175 to the result 7under subd. 1. a., in calculating the limit for the 2020-21 school year, add $179 to 8the result under subd. 1. a., and in calculating the limit for the 2023-24 school year 9and the 2024-25 each school year, add $325 thereafter, add the amount under par. 10(j) 2m. for that school year to the result under subd. 1. a. In the 2015-16 to 2018-19 11school years, the 2021-22 school year, and the 2022-23 school year, the 2025-26 12school year, and any school year thereafter, make no adjustment to the result under 13subd. 1. a.SB491,1614Section 16. 121.91 (2m) (s) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB491,6,315121.91 (2m) (s) 1. b. Add an amount equal to the amount of revenue increase 16per pupil allowed under this subsection for the previous school year multiplied by 17the sum of 1.0 plus the allowable rate of increase under s. 73.0305 expressed as a 18decimal to the result under subd. 1. a., except that in calculating the limit for the 192013-14 school year and the 2014-15 school year, add $75 to the result under subd. 201. a., in calculating the limit for the 2019-20 school year, add $175 to the result 21under subd. 1. a., in calculating the limit for the 2020-21 school year, add $179 to 22the result under subd. 1. a., and in calculating the limit for the 2023-24 school year 23and the 2024-25 each school year, add $325 thereafter, add the amount under par. 24(j) 2m. for that school year to the result under subd. 1. a. In the 2015-16 to 2018-19 1school years, the 2021-22 school year, and the 2022-23 school year, the 2025-26 2school year, and any school year thereafter, make no adjustment to the result under 3subd. 1. a.SB491,174Section 17. Fiscal changes.SB491,6,85(1) General school aids. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 6appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (2) (ac), the 7dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $493,800,000 and the dollar 8amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $699,900,000.SB491,189Section 18. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 10publication, except as follows:SB491,6,1211(1) The treatment of s. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. (by Section 6) and the repeal of 12ss. 20.255 (2) (ab) and 121.105 (5) take effect on July 1, 2026.SB491,6,1313